dicts-oat/spellcheck/ru_RU/main.aff
FLAG num
SFX 189 Y 133
SFX 189 ить ить .
SFX 189 ить ю .
SFX 189 ить им .
SFX 189 ить ишь .
SFX 189 ить ите .
SFX 189 ить ит .
SFX 189 ить ят .
SFX 189 ить ил .
SFX 189 ить ила .
SFX 189 ить ило .
SFX 189 ить или .
SFX 189 ить я .
SFX 189 ить ив .
SFX 189 ить ивши .
SFX 189 ить ь .
SFX 189 ить ьте .
SFX 189 ить ящий .
SFX 189 ить ящего .
SFX 189 ить ящему .
SFX 189 ить ящего .
SFX 189 ить ящий .
SFX 189 ить ящим .
SFX 189 ить ящем .
SFX 189 ить ящая .
SFX 189 ить ящей .
SFX 189 ить ящей .
SFX 189 ить ящую .
SFX 189 ить ящей .
SFX 189 ить ящею .
SFX 189 ить ящей .
SFX 189 ить ящее .
SFX 189 ить ящего .
SFX 189 ить ящему .
SFX 189 ить ящее .
SFX 189 ить ящим .
SFX 189 ить ящем .
SFX 189 ить ящие .
SFX 189 ить ящих .
SFX 189 ить ящим .
SFX 189 ить ящих .
SFX 189 ить ящие .
SFX 189 ить ящими .
SFX 189 ить ящих .
SFX 189 ить ивший .
SFX 189 ить ившего .
SFX 189 ить ившему .
SFX 189 ить ившего .
SFX 189 ить ивший .
SFX 189 ить ившим .
SFX 189 ить ившем .
SFX 189 ить ившая .
SFX 189 ить ившей .
SFX 189 ить ившей .
SFX 189 ить ившую .
SFX 189 ить ившей .
SFX 189 ить ившею .
SFX 189 ить ившей .
SFX 189 ить ившее .
SFX 189 ить ившего .
SFX 189 ить ившему .
SFX 189 ить ившее .
SFX 189 ить ившим .
SFX 189 ить ившем .
SFX 189 ить ившие .
SFX 189 ить ивших .
SFX 189 ить ившим .
SFX 189 ить ивших .
SFX 189 ить ившие .
SFX 189 ить ившими .
SFX 189 ить ивших .
SFX 189 ить имый .
SFX 189 ить имого .
SFX 189 ить имому .
SFX 189 ить имого .
SFX 189 ить имый .
SFX 189 ить имым .
SFX 189 ить имом .
SFX 189 ить им .
SFX 189 ить имая .
SFX 189 ить имой .
SFX 189 ить имой .
SFX 189 ить имую .
SFX 189 ить имой .
SFX 189 ить имою .
SFX 189 ить имой .
SFX 189 ить има .
SFX 189 ить имое .
SFX 189 ить имого .
SFX 189 ить имому .
SFX 189 ить имое .
SFX 189 ить имым .
SFX 189 ить имом .
SFX 189 ить имо .
SFX 189 ить имые .
SFX 189 ить имых .
SFX 189 ить имым .
SFX 189 ить имых .
SFX 189 ить имые .
SFX 189 ить имыми .
SFX 189 ить имых .
SFX 189 ить имы .
SFX 189 ить енный .
SFX 189 ить енного .
SFX 189 ить енному .
SFX 189 ить енного .
SFX 189 ить енный .
SFX 189 ить енным .
SFX 189 ить енном .
SFX 189 ить ен .
SFX 189 ить енная .
SFX 189 ить енной .
SFX 189 ить енной .
SFX 189 ить енную .
SFX 189 ить енной .
SFX 189 ить енною .
SFX 189 ить енной .
SFX 189 ить ена .
SFX 189 ить енное .
SFX 189 ить енного .
SFX 189 ить енному .
SFX 189 ить енное .
SFX 189 ить енным .
SFX 189 ить енном .
SFX 189 ить ено .
SFX 189 ить енные .
SFX 189 ить енных .
SFX 189 ить енным .
SFX 189 ить енных .
SFX 189 ить енные .
SFX 189 ить енными .
SFX 189 ить енных .
SFX 189 ить ены .
SFX 189 ить ованные .

SFX 190 Y 7
SFX 190 оль оль .
SFX 190 оль ля .
SFX 190 оль лю .
SFX 190 оль оль .
SFX 190 оль лем .
SFX 190 оль ле .
SFX 190 оль ят .

SFX 192 Y 8
SFX 192 а а .
SFX 192 а и .
SFX 192 а е .
SFX 192 а у .
SFX 192 а ей .
SFX 192 а ею .
SFX 192 а е .
SFX 192 а ил .

SFX 194 Y 7
SFX 194 ая ая .
SFX 194 ая ой .
SFX 194 ая ой .
SFX 194 ая ую .
SFX 194 ая ой .
SFX 194 ая ой .
SFX 194 ая е .

SFX 195 Y 32
SFX 195 йкий йкий .
SFX 195 йкий йкого .
SFX 195 йкий йкому .
SFX 195 йкий йкого .
SFX 195 йкий йкий .
SFX 195 йкий йким .
SFX 195 йкий йком .
SFX 195 йкий йкая .
SFX 195 йкий йкой .
SFX 195 йкий йкой .
SFX 195 йкий йкую .
SFX 195 йкий йкой .
SFX 195 йкий йкою .
SFX 195 йкий йкой .
SFX 195 йкий йкое .
SFX 195 йкий йкого .
SFX 195 йкий йкому .
SFX 195 йкий йкое .
SFX 195 йкий йким .
SFX 195 йкий йком .
SFX 195 йкий йкие .
SFX 195 йкий йких .
SFX 195 йкий йким .
SFX 195 йкий йких .
SFX 195 йкий йкие .
SFX 195 йкий йкими .
SFX 195 йкий йких .
SFX 195 йкий ек .
SFX 195 йкий йка .
SFX 195 йкий йко .
SFX 195 йкий йки .
SFX 195 йкий ящего .

SFX 196 Y 44
SFX 196 уться уться .
SFX 196 уться улся .
SFX 196 уться улась .
SFX 196 уться улось .
SFX 196 уться улись .
SFX 196 уться усь .
SFX 196 уться ёмся .
SFX 196 уться ёшься .
SFX 196 уться ётесь .
SFX 196 уться ётся .
SFX 196 уться утся .
SFX 196 уться увшись .
SFX 196 уться ёмся .
SFX 196 уться ёмтесь .
SFX 196 уться ись .
SFX 196 уться итесь .
SFX 196 уться увшийся .
SFX 196 уться увшегося .
SFX 196 уться увшемуся .
SFX 196 уться увшегося .
SFX 196 уться увшийся .
SFX 196 уться увшимся .
SFX 196 уться увшемся .
SFX 196 уться увшаяся .
SFX 196 уться увшейся .
SFX 196 уться увшейся .
SFX 196 уться увшуюся .
SFX 196 уться увшейся .
SFX 196 уться увшеюся .
SFX 196 уться увшейся .
SFX 196 уться увшееся .
SFX 196 уться увшегося .
SFX 196 уться увшемуся .
SFX 196 уться увшееся .
SFX 196 уться увшимся .
SFX 196 уться увшемся .
SFX 196 уться увшиеся .
SFX 196 уться увшихся .
SFX 196 уться увшимся .
SFX 196 уться увшихся .
SFX 196 уться увшиеся .
SFX 196 уться увшимися .
SFX 196 уться увшихся .
SFX 196 уться ивший .

SFX 198 Y 7
SFX 198 и и .
SFX 198 и ов .
SFX 198 и ам .
SFX 198 и и .
SFX 198 и ами .
SFX 198 и ах .
SFX 198 и емся .

SFX 199 Y 76
SFX 199 уть уть .
SFX 199 уть ул .
SFX 199 уть ула .
SFX 199 уть уло .
SFX 199 уть ули .
SFX 199 уть у .
SFX 199 уть ем .
SFX 199 уть ешь .
SFX 199 уть ете .
SFX 199 уть ет .
SFX 199 уть ут .
SFX 199 уть ув .
SFX 199 уть увши .
SFX 199 уть ем .
SFX 199 уть емте .
SFX 199 уть и .
SFX 199 уть ите .
SFX 199 уть увший .
SFX 199 уть увшего .
SFX 199 уть увшему .
SFX 199 уть увшего .
SFX 199 уть увший .
SFX 199 уть увшим .
SFX 199 уть увшем .
SFX 199 уть увшая .
SFX 199 уть увшей .
SFX 199 уть увшей .
SFX 199 уть увшую .
SFX 199 уть увшей .
SFX 199 уть увшею .
SFX 199 уть увшей .
SFX 199 уть увшее .
SFX 199 уть увшего .
SFX 199 уть увшему .
SFX 199 уть увшее .
SFX 199 уть увшим .
SFX 199 уть увшем .
SFX 199 уть увшие .
SFX 199 уть увших .
SFX 199 уть увшим .
SFX 199 уть увших .
SFX 199 уть увшие .
SFX 199 уть увшими .
SFX 199 уть увших .
SFX 199 уть утый .
SFX 199 уть утого .
SFX 199 уть утому .
SFX 199 уть утого .
SFX 199 уть утый .
SFX 199 уть утым .
SFX 199 уть утом .
SFX 199 уть ут .
SFX 199 уть утая .
SFX 199 уть утой .
SFX 199 уть утой .
SFX 199 уть утую .
SFX 199 уть утой .
SFX 199 уть утою .
SFX 199 уть утой .
SFX 199 уть ута .
SFX 199 уть утое .
SFX 199 уть утого .
SFX 199 уть утому .
SFX 199 уть утое .
SFX 199 уть утым .
SFX 199 уть утом .
SFX 199 уть уто .
SFX 199 уть утые .
SFX 199 уть утых .
SFX 199 уть утым .
SFX 199 уть утых .
SFX 199 уть утые .
SFX 199 уть утыми .
SFX 199 уть утых .
SFX 199 уть уты .
SFX 199 уть имым .

SFX 200 Y 13
SFX 200 ень ень .
SFX 200 ень ня .
SFX 200 ень ню .
SFX 200 ень ень .
SFX 200 ень нем .
SFX 200 ень не .
SFX 200 ень ни .
SFX 200 ень ней .
SFX 200 ень ням .
SFX 200 ень ни .
SFX 200 ень нями .
SFX 200 ень нях .
SFX 200 ень увши .

SFX 205 Y 133
SFX 205 ть ть .
SFX 205 ть ю .
SFX 205 ть ем .
SFX 205 ть ешь .
SFX 205 ть ете .
SFX 205 ть ет .
SFX 205 ть ют .
SFX 205 ть л .
SFX 205 ть ла .
SFX 205 ть ло .
SFX 205 ть ли .
SFX 205 ть я .
SFX 205 ть в .
SFX 205 ть вши .
SFX 205 ть й .
SFX 205 ть йте .
SFX 205 ть ющий .
SFX 205 ть ющего .
SFX 205 ть ющему .
SFX 205 ть ющего .
SFX 205 ть ющий .
SFX 205 ть ющим .
SFX 205 ть ющем .
SFX 205 ть ющая .
SFX 205 ть ющей .
SFX 205 ть ющей .
SFX 205 ть ющую .
SFX 205 ть ющей .
SFX 205 ть ющею .
SFX 205 ть ющей .
SFX 205 ть ющее .
SFX 205 ть ющего .
SFX 205 ть ющему .
SFX 205 ть ющее .
SFX 205 ть ющим .
SFX 205 ть ющем .
SFX 205 ть ющие .
SFX 205 ть ющих .
SFX 205 ть ющим .
SFX 205 ть ющих .
SFX 205 ть ющие .
SFX 205 ть ющими .
SFX 205 ть ющих .
SFX 205 ть вший .
SFX 205 ть вшего .
SFX 205 ть вшему .
SFX 205 ть вшего .
SFX 205 ть вший .
SFX 205 ть вшим .
SFX 205 ть вшем .
SFX 205 ть вшая .
SFX 205 ть вшей .
SFX 205 ть вшей .
SFX 205 ть вшую .
SFX 205 ть вшей .
SFX 205 ть вшею .
SFX 205 ть вшей .
SFX 205 ть вшее .
SFX 205 ть вшего .
SFX 205 ть вшему .
SFX 205 ть вшее .
SFX 205 ть вшим .
SFX 205 ть вшем .
SFX 205 ть вшие .
SFX 205 ть вших .
SFX 205 ть вшим .
SFX 205 ть вших .
SFX 205 ть вшие .
SFX 205 ть вшими .
SFX 205 ть вших .
SFX 205 ть емый .
SFX 205 ть емого .
SFX 205 ть емому .
SFX 205 ть емого .
SFX 205 ть емый .
SFX 205 ть емым .
SFX 205 ть емом .
SFX 205 ть ем .
SFX 205 ть емая .
SFX 205 ть емой .
SFX 205 ть емой .
SFX 205 ть емую .
SFX 205 ть емой .
SFX 205 ть емою .
SFX 205 ть емой .
SFX 205 ть ема .
SFX 205 ть емое .
SFX 205 ть емого .
SFX 205 ть емому .
SFX 205 ть емое .
SFX 205 ть емым .
SFX 205 ть емом .
SFX 205 ть емо .
SFX 205 ть емые .
SFX 205 ть емых .
SFX 205 ть емым .
SFX 205 ть емых .
SFX 205 ть емые .
SFX 205 ть емыми .
SFX 205 ть емых .
SFX 205 ть емы .
SFX 205 ть нный .
SFX 205 ть нного .
SFX 205 ть нному .
SFX 205 ть нного .
SFX 205 ть нный .
SFX 205 ть нным .
SFX 205 ть нном .
SFX 205 ть н .
SFX 205 ть нная .
SFX 205 ть нной .
SFX 205 ть нной .
SFX 205 ть нную .
SFX 205 ть нной .
SFX 205 ть нною .
SFX 205 ть нной .
SFX 205 ть на .
SFX 205 ть нное .
SFX 205 ть нного .
SFX 205 ть нному .
SFX 205 ть нное .
SFX 205 ть нным .
SFX 205 ть нном .
SFX 205 ть но .
SFX 205 ть нные .
SFX 205 ть нных .
SFX 205 ть нным .
SFX 205 ть нных .
SFX 205 ть нные .
SFX 205 ть нными .
SFX 205 ть нных .
SFX 205 ть ны .
SFX 205 ть ованные .

SFX 206 Y 70
SFX 206 иться иться .
SFX 206 иться люсь .
SFX 206 иться имся .
SFX 206 иться ишься .
SFX 206 иться итесь .
SFX 206 иться ится .
SFX 206 иться ятся .
SFX 206 иться ился .
SFX 206 иться илась .
SFX 206 иться илось .
SFX 206 иться ились .
SFX 206 иться ясь .
SFX 206 иться ившись .
SFX 206 иться ься .
SFX 206 иться ьтесь .
SFX 206 иться ящийся .
SFX 206 иться ящегося .
SFX 206 иться ящемуся .
SFX 206 иться ящегося .
SFX 206 иться ящийся .
SFX 206 иться ящимся .
SFX 206 иться ящемся .
SFX 206 иться ящаяся .
SFX 206 иться ящейся .
SFX 206 иться ящейся .
SFX 206 иться ящуюся .
SFX 206 иться ящейся .
SFX 206 иться ящеюся .
SFX 206 иться ящейся .
SFX 206 иться ящееся .
SFX 206 иться ящегося .
SFX 206 иться ящемуся .
SFX 206 иться ящееся .
SFX 206 иться ящимся .
SFX 206 иться ящемся .
SFX 206 иться ящиеся .
SFX 206 иться ящихся .
SFX 206 иться ящимся .
SFX 206 иться ящихся .
SFX 206 иться ящиеся .
SFX 206 иться ящимися .
SFX 206 иться ящихся .
SFX 206 иться ившийся .
SFX 206 иться ившегося .
SFX 206 иться ившемуся .
SFX 206 иться ившегося .
SFX 206 иться ившийся .
SFX 206 иться ившимся .
SFX 206 иться ившемся .
SFX 206 иться ившаяся .
SFX 206 иться ившейся .
SFX 206 иться ившейся .
SFX 206 иться ившуюся .
SFX 206 иться ившейся .
SFX 206 иться ившеюся .
SFX 206 иться ившейся .
SFX 206 иться ившееся .
SFX 206 иться ившегося .
SFX 206 иться ившемуся .
SFX 206 иться ившееся .
SFX 206 иться ившимся .
SFX 206 иться ившемся .
SFX 206 иться ившиеся .
SFX 206 иться ившихся .
SFX 206 иться ившимся .
SFX 206 иться ившихся .
SFX 206 иться ившиеся .
SFX 206 иться ившимися .
SFX 206 иться ившихся .
SFX 206 иться вших .

SFX 207 Y 14
SFX 207 я я .
SFX 207 я и .
SFX 207 я е .
SFX 207 я ю .
SFX 207 я ей .
SFX 207 я ею .
SFX 207 я е .
SFX 207 я и .
SFX 207 я ь .
SFX 207 я ям .
SFX 207 я ь .
SFX 207 я ями .
SFX 207 я ях .
SFX 207 я ься .

SFX 208 Y 14
SFX 208 ька ька .
SFX 208 ька ьки .
SFX 208 ька ьке .
SFX 208 ька ьку .
SFX 208 ька ькой .
SFX 208 ька ькою .
SFX 208 ька ьке .
SFX 208 ька ьки .
SFX 208 ька ек .
SFX 208 ька ькам .
SFX 208 ька ек .
SFX 208 ька ьками .
SFX 208 ька ьках .
SFX 208 ька ься .

SFX 210 Y 7
SFX 210 ё ё .
SFX 210 ё я .
SFX 210 ё ю .
SFX 210 ё ё .
SFX 210 ё ём .
SFX 210 ё е .
SFX 210 ё ьке .
